District of Columbia statutes.
2-1217.136

Payment and security.

(a)

Except as may be otherwise provided in this subchapter, Debt Service shall be payable from proceeds received from the sale of the bonds, income realized from the temporary investment of those proceeds, receipts and revenues deposited into the Southwest Waterfront Fund, including income realized from the investment of those receipts and revenues, and other funds that, as provided in the Financing Documents, may be made available to the District for payment of the bonds from sources other than the District, all as provided for in the Financing Documents.

(b)

There is further allocated to payment of Debt Service the Available Increment, subordinate to the allocation of the Available Increment to the Budgeted Reserve, as defined in the Reserve Agreement, all as more fully described in the Reserve Agreement and to the extent that the Reserve Agreement continues to apply to the Available Increment, to be used for the payment of Debt Service to the extent that the revenues allocated in subsection (a) of this section are inadequate to pay Debt Service. The allocation of Available Increment authorized by this subsection shall be made in compliance with all existing contractual obligations of the District with respect to the Available Increment and shall terminate on the date on which all of the bonds are paid or provided for and are no longer outstanding pursuant to their terms.

(c)

Payment of the bonds shall be secured as provided in the Financing Documents and by an assignment by the District for the benefit of the bond holders of certain of its rights under the Financing Documents and Closing Documents to the trustee for the bonds pursuant to the Financing Documents.

(d)

The trustee is authorized to deposit, invest, and disburse the proceeds received from the sale of the bonds pursuant to the Financing Documents.

History

Oct. 22, 2008, D.C. Law 17-252, § 106, 55 DCR 9251

Section References

This section is referenced in § 2-1217.135.